Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 237 Firearms and Destructive Devices

237.020.
Right of Kentucky residents, out-of-state residents, and residents of other countries to buy firearms.

Residents of the Commonwealth of Kentucky who are citizens of the United States shall have the right to purchase or otherwise acquire rifles, shotguns, handguns, and any other firearms which they are permitted to purchase or otherwise acquire under federal law and the Kentucky Revised Statutes from properly licensed dealers, manufacturers, importers, or collectors, and unlicensed individual persons in Kentucky or in any other state or nation outside of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Residents of states other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky who are citizens of the United States shall have the right to purchase or otherwise acquire rifles, shotguns, handguns, and any other firearms which they are permitted to purchase or otherwise acquire under federal law and the Kentucky Revised Statutes from properly licensed dealers, manufacturers, importers, or collectors, and from unlicensed individual persons in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Citizens of countries other than the United States shall have the right to purchase or otherwise acquire rifles, shotguns, handguns, and any other firearms which they are permitted to purchase or otherwise acquire under federal law and the Kentucky Revised Statutes from properly licensed dealers, manufacturers, importers, or collectors, and from unlicensed individual persons in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

All such sales shall conform to the requirements of federal law, the Kentucky Revised Statutes, applicable local ordinances, and the law of the purchaser’s state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 27, § 2; 2007, ch. 119, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

237.025.
Requirements for local gun buy-back programs.

Each law enforcement agency of state, county, urban-county, charter county, or city government or any other law enforcement agency that participates in a “gun buy-back program” or other program in which firearms or ammunition are purchased or surrendered for the purpose of destruction shall assure that:

The serial number of each firearm that is purchased or surrendered to the program is checked against local, state, and federal records of stolen firearms and, if it is found that the firearm is a stolen firearm, that the firearm is not destroyed without the written permission of the lawful owner thereof and that if the lawful owner of the firearm does not give written permission for the firearm to be destroyed, that the firearm is returned to its lawful owner;

If it is determined that a firearm that is purchased by, or surrendered to the “gun buy-back program” is stolen, that the law enforcement makes an effort to arrest the thief or any person who possessed the firearm knowing it was stolen; and

Prior to the destruction of any firearm that is purchased or surrendered, that a written determination is made as to whether the firearm may have been used in a crime, and that if it is determined that the firearm probably was used in a crime, that it is retained for evidence, and if it is determined that the firearm probably was not used in a crime, if the firearm is a rifled firearm, that a fired bullet and fired cartridge case is retained for possible use as evidence and that if the firearm is a smooth bore firearm, that a fired cartridge case is retained for possible use as evidence.

Prior to returning a stolen firearm to a lawful owner, the law enforcement agency shall determine whether or not the lawful owner is eligible to possess a firearm under federal law. If the lawful owner of the firearm is ineligible to possess a firearm under federal law, the law enforcement agency may destroy the firearm after compliance with subsection (1)(c) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

237.030.
Definitions for KRS 237.040 and 237.050.

“Destructive device” means any explosive, incendiary, or poison gas bomb, grenade, mine, rocket, missile, or similar device and includes the unassembled components from which such a device can be made.

“Booby trap device” includes any device, or substance designed to surreptitiously or covertly take life, endanger life or destroy or damage property and shall not include firearms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 33, § 1.

237.040.
Criminal possession of destructive device or booby trap device.

A person is guilty of criminal possession of a destructive device or a booby trap device when he possesses, manufactures, or transports such substance or device with:

Intent to use that device to commit an offense against the laws of this state, a political subdivision thereof, or of the United States; or

Knowledge that some other person intends to use that device to commit an offense against the laws of this state, a political subdivision thereof, or of the United States.

Mere possession without substantial evidence of the requisite intent is insufficient to bring action under KRS

237.030

to

237.050

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 33, § 2.

237.050.
Exemptions.

KRS

237.030

to

237.050

shall not apply to:

Destructive devices or booby trap devices which are possessed by the government of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision thereof;

Any device which is lawfully possessed under the Gun Control Act of 1968, the Organized Crime Control Act of 1971, or any other law of the United States or this state, unless a crime is committed therewith;

Nonlethal devices placed on the premises of the owner or the lawful occupant thereof for his own self-protection or the protection of the said property;

The setting of traps suitable and legal for the taking of game by persons licensed or permitted to do so by the game laws of the Commonwealth;

Inert devices which cannot readily be restored to operating condition; or

The acquisition, possession, use, or control of firearms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 33, § 3.

237.060.
Definitions for KRS 237.060 to 237.090 and certain other sections.

The following definitions apply in KRS

237.060

to

237.090

and KRS

197.170

,

218A.992

,

244.125

,

244.990

, and

514.110

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Handgun” means any pistol or revolver originally designed to be fired by the use of a single hand, or any other firearm originally designed to be fired by the use of a single hand.

“Firearm” means any weapon which will expel a projectile by the action of an explosive.

“Licensed gun dealer” means a person who has a federal firearms license and any business license required by a state or local government entity.

“Loaded” with respect to a firearm means:

There is ammunition in the chamber of the firearm; or

There is ammunition in the cylinder of the firearm; or

There is ammunition in the magazine of a firearm, if the magazine is attached to the firearm.

“Juvenile” means a person who has not attained his eighteenth birthday.

“Ammunition” means loaded ammunition designed for use in any firearm.

“Armor-piercing ammunition” means a projectile or projectile core which may be used in a handgun and which is constructed entirely (excluding the presence of traces of other substances) from one (1) or a combination of tungsten alloys, steel, iron, brass, bronze, beryllium copper, or depleted uranium. “Armor piercing ammunition” does not include shotgun shot required by federal or state environmental or game regulations for hunting purposes, a frangible projectile designed for target shooting, a projectile which the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States finds is primarily intended to be used for sporting purposes, or any other projectile or projectile core which the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States finds is intended to be used for industrial purposes, including a charge used in an oil and gas well perforating device.

“Flanged ammunition” means ammunition with a soft lead core and having sharp flanges which are designed to expand on impact.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 191, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

237.070.
Prohibition against sale or transfer of firearm to convicted felon.

No person shall knowingly sell or transfer a firearm to any person prohibited from possessing it by KRS

527.040

.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any firearm transferred in violation of this section shall be subject to forfeiture and shall be disposed of pursuant to KRS

237.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 396, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.075.
Chief law enforcement officer’s certification for transfer or making of a firearm — Immunity from liability — Appeal of denial of certification request.

For purposes of this section:

“Certification” means the participation and assent of the chief law enforcement officer necessary under federal law for the approval of the application to transfer or make a firearm;

“Chief law enforcement officer” means the sheriff of the county of the applicant’s residence, notwithstanding the provisions of 27 C.F.R. secs. 479.63 and 479.85; and

“Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in the National Firearms Act, 26

U.S.C. sec. 5845(a)

.

When a chief law enforcement officer’s certification is required by federal law or regulation for the transfer or making of a firearm, the chief law enforcement officer shall, within fifteen (15) days of receipt of a request for certification, provide this certification if the applicant is not prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm and is not the subject of a proceeding that could result in the applicant being prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm. If the chief law enforcement officer is unable to make a certification as required by this section, he or she shall provide the applicant a written notification of the denial and the reason for this determination.

A chief law enforcement officer is not required to make any certification under this subsection he or she knows to be untrue, but he or she may not refuse to provide certification based on a generalized objection to private persons or entities making, possessing, or receiving firearms or any certain type of firearm the possession of which is not prohibited by law.

Chief law enforcement officers and their employees who act in good faith are immune from liability arising from any act or omission in making a certification as required by this section.

An applicant whose request for certification is denied may appeal the chief law enforcement officer’s decision to the Circuit Court that is located in the county in which the applicant resides. The court shall review the chief law enforcement officer’s decision to deny the certification de novo. If the court finds that the applicant is not prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm, is not the subject of a proceeding that could result in such prohibition, and that no substantial evidence supports the chief law enforcement officer’s determination that he or she cannot truthfully make the certification, the court shall order the chief law enforcement officer to issue the certification and award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the applicant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 15, 2014.

237.080.
Prohibition against manufacture, sale, delivery, transfer, or importation of armor-piercing ammunition — Exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly manufacture, sell, deliver, transfer, or import armor-piercing ammunition.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to members of the Armed Forces of the United States or law enforcement officers within the scope of their duties, nor shall it prohibit licensed gun dealers from possessing armor-piercing ammunition for the purpose of receiving and transferring it to members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or law enforcement officers for use within the scope of their duties.

A violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.

Any armor-piercing ammunition transferred, sold, or offered for sale, in violation of this section is contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state and shall be disposed of pursuant to KRS

237.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.090.
Disposition of forfeited firearm or ammunition.

Any firearm or ammunition forfeited pursuant to KRS

237.060

to

237.090

shall, upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be disposed of or retained as provided in KRS

500.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 396, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 606, § 126, effective July 15, 1998.

237.095.
Persons barred by federal law from purchase of firearms — Duty to notify courts and law enforcement agencies of purchase or attempt to purchase — Protocol for providing notice — Duty to notify petitioner — Immunity from liability.

Upon receiving notice that a person barred from purchasing a firearm under 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(g)(8)

has purchased or attempted to purchase a firearm, any agency with the responsibility of entering domestic violence records into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall notify:

The court in the jurisdiction where the domestic violence order was issued under KRS

403.750

; and

The law enforcement agencies, as designated by the Department of Kentucky State Police, that have jurisdiction in the county where the domestic violence order was issued and in the county of the victim’s residence if different from the county where the domestic violence order was issued.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall develop a protocol for providing notice to the required court and law enforcement agencies under subsection (1) of this section. Within the protocol, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall designate which local law enforcement agencies are to receive notice in each county. A minimum of one (1) law enforcement agency shall be designated in each county.

When a designated law enforcement agency for the county where the domestic violence order was issued or where the victim resides receives notice under subsection (1)(b) of this section, that agency shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the petitioner who obtained the domestic violence order is notified that the respondent has purchased or attempted to purchase a firearm.

Any person carrying out responsibilities under this section shall be immune from civil liability for good faith conduct in carrying out those responsibilities.

This section shall apply only to domestic violence orders issued, or reissued, on or after July 14, 2000, through July 15, 2002.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 401, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 264, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Gold, Note, Why Are Victims of Domestic Violence Still Dying at the Hands of Their Abusers? Filling the Gap in State Domestic Violence Gun Laws, 91 Ky. L.J. 957 (2002).

237.100.
Notification of purchase of firearm or attempt to purchase firearm — Immunity.

Upon receipt of notice that a person barred from purchasing a firearm under 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(g)(8)

has purchased or attempted to purchase a firearm, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall make a reasonable effort to provide notice to the petitioner who obtained the domestic violence order issued under KRS

403.740

that the respondent to the order has attempted to purchase a firearm. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may contract with a private entity in order to provide notification.

The notification shall be limited to a petitioner who has:

Received a domestic violence protective order issued or reissued under KRS

403.740

on or after July 15, 2002;

Received a domestic violence protective order that involves a respondent who is prohibited by 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(g)(8)

from possessing a firearm; and

Provided the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the entity with a request for notification.

Any person carrying out responsibilities under this section shall be immune from civil liability for good faith conduct in carrying out those responsibilities. Nothing in this subsection shall limit liability for negligence.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 265, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 102, § 41, effective January 1, 2016.

237.102.
Suspension, revocation, limitation, or impairment of concealed deadly weapon license permitted only in accordance with KRS 237.110 and 237.138 to 237.142.

No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall have the authority to suspend, revoke, limit the use of, or impair the validity of a concealed deadly weapon license issued pursuant to KRS

237.110

, or a foreign license which is recognized as valid pursuant to KRS

237.110

, unless the license is revoked for the reasons specified in KRS 237.110 and the revocation is done in the manner specified in KRS 237.110.

No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall have the authority to suspend, revoke, limit the use of, or impair the validity of a concealed deadly weapon license which is issued pursuant to KRS

237.138

to

237.142

unless the license is revoked for the reasons specified in KRS

237.110

or

237.138

to

237.142

.

No action which may be taken pursuant to KRS Chapter 39A shall apply with regard to a license specified in this section or to a person who is the holder of a license specified in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 240, § 6, effective July 12, 2006.

237.104.
Rights to acquire, carry, and use deadly weapons not to be impaired — Seizure of deadly weapons prohibited — Application of section.

No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall, during a period of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other time, have the right to revoke, suspend, limit the use of, or otherwise impair the validity of the right of any person to purchase, transfer, loan, own, possess, carry, or use a firearm, firearm part, ammunition, ammunition component, or any deadly weapon or dangerous instrument.

No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall, during a period of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other time, take, seize, confiscate, or impound a firearm, firearm part, ammunition, ammunition component, or any deadly weapon or dangerous instrument from any person.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the taking of an item specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section from a person who is:

Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to KRS

527.040

;

Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to federal law;

Violating KRS

527.020

;

In possession of a stolen firearm;

Using a firearm in the commission of a separate criminal offense; or

Using a firearm or other weapon in the commission of an offense under KRS Chapter 150.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 240, § 7, effective July 12, 2006.

Compiler's Notes.

This section has been reprinted to correct errors appearing in the bound volume.

237.106.
Right of employees and other persons to possess firearms in vehicle — Employer liable for denying right — Exceptions.

No person, including but not limited to an employer, who is the owner, lessee, or occupant of real property shall prohibit any person who is legally entitled to possess a firearm from possessing a firearm, part of a firearm, ammunition, or ammunition component in a vehicle on the property.

A person, including but not limited to an employer, who owns, leases, or otherwise occupies real property may prevent a person who is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm or ammunition from possessing a firearm or ammunition on the property.

A firearm may be removed from the vehicle or handled in the case of self-defense, defense of another, defense of property, or as authorized by the owner, lessee, or occupant of the property.

An employer that fires, disciplines, demotes, or otherwise punishes an employee who is lawfully exercising a right guaranteed by this section and who is engaging in conduct in compliance with this statute shall be liable in civil damages. An employee may seek and the court shall grant an injunction against an employer who is violating the provisions of this section when it is found that the employee is in compliance with the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any real property:

Owned, leased, or occupied by the United States government, upon which the possession or carrying of firearms is prohibited or controlled;

Of a detention facility as defined in KRS

520.010

; or

Where a section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes specifically prohibits possession or carrying of firearms on the property.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 240, § 8, effective July 12, 2006.

237.108.
Persons adjudicated mentally defective and committed to mental institutions — Identifying information to be forwarded to Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation — Information to be included in National Instant Criminal Background Check System database — Petition to court for relief from prohibition against possession of firearms — Prohibition against allowing improper use of information obtained by Kentucky State Police.

A court that orders a commitment or makes a finding or adjudication under which a person becomes subject to the provisions of 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(4)

and (g)(4) shall order the circuit clerk to forward the person’s name and nonclinical identifying information, including the person’s Social Security number and date of birth, along with a copy of the order of commitment to the Department of Kentucky State Police, which in turn shall forward the information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, its successor agency, or agency designated by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database. The court shall also notify the person of the prohibitions of 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(4)

and (g)(4).

A person who is subject to the provisions of 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(4)

and (g)(4) because of a commitment, finding, or adjudication that occurred in this state may petition the court in which such commitment, finding, or adjudication occurred to remove, pursuant to Section 105(a) of Pub. L. No. 110-180, the disabilities imposed under 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(4)

and (g)(4). A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the director of the Division of Behavioral Health and the county attorney of the county in which the original commitment, finding, or adjudication occurred. The director of the Division of Behavioral Health and the county attorney may, as each deems appropriate, appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner. The court shall receive and consider evidence in a closed proceeding, including evidence offered by the petitioner concerning:

The circumstances of the original commitment, finding, or adjudication;

The petitioner’s mental health and criminal history records, if any;

The petitioner’s reputation;

The petitioner’s date of birth and Social Security number; and

Changes in the petitioner’s condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner will not be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety and that granting of the relief would not be contrary to the public interest. A record shall be kept of the proceedings, but it shall remain confidential and be disclosed only to a court in the event of an appeal. The petitioner may appeal a denial of the requested relief, and review on appeal shall be de novo. A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

When the court issues an order granting a petition for relief under subsection (2) of this section, the circuit clerk shall immediately forward a copy of the order to the Department of Kentucky State Police, which in turn shall immediately forward a copy to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or its successor agency, for updating of the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and shall remove all information in any database over which the department exercises control relating to the person whose relief from disability is granted and shall immediately destroy all paper copies of the order of commitment and other documents relating to the matter.

If a petition is granted under this section, the order, finding, or adjudication for which relief is granted shall, pursuant to Section 105(a) of Pub. L. No. 110-180, be deemed not to have occurred for purposes of 18

U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(4)

and (g)(4).

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall not use or permit the use of the records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not specified in this section.

The provisions of this section shall supersede any other statute to the contrary for the purposes set forth in this section but otherwise shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental to any other statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

237.109.
Authorization to carry concealed deadly weapons without a license.

Persons age twenty-one (21) or older, and otherwise able to lawfully possess a firearm, may carry concealed firearms or other concealed deadly weapons without a license in the same locations as persons with valid licenses issued under KRS

237.110

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the carrying or possession of any deadly weapon where it is prohibited by federal law.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 10, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.